Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-3810
No effect on more generous paid sick time policies or laws; nonwaiver of rights and remedies.

(1) The Nebraska Healthy Families and Workplaces Act provides minimum requirements pertaining to paid sick time, and nothing in the act shall be construed to:

(a) Prohibit an employer from the adoption or retention of a paid sick time policy more generous than the one required by the act;

(b) Diminish the obligation of an employer to comply with any contract, collective-bargaining agreement, employment benefit plan, or other agreement providing more generous paid sick time to an employee than required by the act;

(c) Diminish the rights of public employees regarding paid sick time or use of paid sick time as provided in state or local law; or

(d) Preempt, limit, or otherwise affect the applicability of any other law, regulation, requirement, policy, or standard that provides for a greater amount, accrual, or use by employees of paid sick time or that extends other protections to employees.

(2) The rights and remedies under the Nebraska Healthy Families and Workplaces Act shall not be waived by any agreement, policy, form, or condition of employment. Any such waiver shall be void and unenforceable.

Initiative Law 2024, No. 436, § 10.